Arkansas, session 2025, SB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-17-203(a), concerning members of a
county planning board, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) With the approval of the majority of the members of the county
quorum court, the county judge of any county may create a county planning
board.
(2) The county planning board shall consist of not less than
five (5) members nor more than twelve (12) members appointed by the judge and
confirmed by the court county quorum court.
(3) At least one-third (⅓) of the members of the county planning
board shall not hold any other elective office or appointment, except
membership on a municipal or joint planning commission or a zoning board of
adjustment.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the county planning
board shall reside in an unincorporated area of the county.

/s/M. Johnson


*SSS208*
03-20-2025 13:41:04 SSS208